Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4348.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TEMPORARY DRILL CORE STORAGE.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 93.61, the commissioner of natural resources may store drill cores at locations other than the drill core library as necessary when space is limited. The commissioner may limit or prohibit access to those drill cores to protect public safety and the drill cores from damage. new text end new text begin (b) This section expires June 30, 2029. new text end